Maryland, session 2025, SB0700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
18–106.
(A) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER LAW, A NOTARY PUBLIC SHALL PROVIDE
REASONABLE ACCOMMODATIONS TO AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A PHYSICAL DISABILITY
THAT LIMITS THE INDIVIDUAL’S ABILITY TO SIGN A RECORD WITHOUT ASSISTANCE,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0700*

SENATE BILL 700
INCLUDING THE REASONABLE ACCOMMODATION SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION.
(B) A NOTARY PUBLIC SHALL NOTARIZE THE SIGNATURE OF AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO IS BLIND AFTER THE NOTARY PUBLIC READS THE ENTIRE RECORD TO THAT
INDIVIDUAL AND THE INDIVIDUAL ASSENTS TO THE NOTARIZATION AFTER THE
READING.
18–208.
(a) If an individual is physically unable to sign a record, the individual may
appear before the notarial officer and direct another individual other than the notarial
officer who is concurrently appearing with the individual before the notarial officer to sign
the individual’s name on the record.
(b) If another individual is directed to sign an individual’s name under subsection
(a) of this section, the notarial officer shall insert on the record the following words or words
of similar import: “Signature affixed by (name of other individual) at the direction of (name
of individual)”.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.